incubator/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.tr.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?> <!-- -*- nxml -*- -->

<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÇĞŞİÖÜabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwzyzçğşıöü</alphabet>
  <!-- Symbol definitions -->
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-tr-az.symbols.xml"/>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Punctuation -->
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
         <re>[’'‘]</re>
         <p>
           <l/>
           <r><s n="apos"/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
   
    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="ve__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="ve"><i>ve</i><par n="ve__cnjcoo"/></e>
      <e lm="ama"><i>ama</i><par n="ve__cnjcoo"/></e>
      <e lm="ile"><i>ile</i><par n="ve__cnjcoo"/></e>
      <e lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="ve__cnjcoo"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/> <!-- Separators -->
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/> <!-- Comma -->
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="cometa"/> <!-- Apostrophe -->
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/> <!-- Left parenthensis -->
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/> <!-- Right parenthesis -->
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="guionet"/> <!-- Hyphen -->
      </e>
